el: Αθλητικά είδη > Αθλητισμός > Καλλιτεχνικό πατινάζ & χόκεϊ > Παγοπέδιλα: Παγοπέδιλα διπλής λεπίδας; Παγοπέδιλα καλλιτεχνικού πατινάζ; Παγοπέδιλα χόκεϊ; Παγοπέδιλα ψυχαγωγίας; Ολισθητήρες χιονιού; Παγοπέδιλα ταχύτητας
sv: Sportartiklar > Idrott och sport > Konståkning och hockey > Skridskor: Dubbelbladiga skridskor; Konståkningsskridskor; Hockeyskridskor; Fritidsskridskor; Snöglidare; Hastighetsskridskor
vi: Dụng cụ thể thao > Điền kinh > Trượt băng nghệ thuật và khúc côn cầu > Giày trượt băng: Giày trượt băng hai lưỡi; Giày trượt băng nghệ thuật; Giày trượt băng hockey; Giày trượt băng giải trí; Máng trượt tuyết; Giày trượt băng tốc độ
it: Articoli sportivi > Sport > Pattinaggio di figura e hockey > Pattini da ghiaccio: Pattini da ghiaccio a doppia lama; Pattini da ghiaccio per pattinaggio artistico; Pattini da ghiaccio per hockey; Pattini da ghiaccio ricreativi; Pattini da neve; Pattini da ghiaccio di velocità
da: Sportsartikler > Atletik > Kunstskøjteløb og ishockey > Isskøjter: Skøjter med dobbelt klinge; Kunstskøjter; Ishockeyskøjter; Fritidsskøjter; Sneskøjter; Speedskøjter
zh-TW: 體育用品 > 競技體育 > 花式滑冰/冰上曲棍球 > 冰刀鞋: 雙刃溜冰鞋; 花式滑冰鞋; 曲棍球溜冰鞋; 休閒溜冰鞋; 滑雪用滑板; 高速溜冰鞋
tr: Spor Malzemeleri > Spor Ekipmanları > Artistik Paten ve Hokey > Buz Patenleri: Çift Bıçaklı Buz Pateni; Artistik Buz Patenleri; Hokey Buz Patenleri; Eğlence Amaçlı Buz Patenleri; Kar Planörleri; Hız Buz Patenleri
es: Equipamiento deportivo > Equipamiento para atletismo > Patinaje artístico y hockey > Patines de hielo: Patines de hielo de doble hoja; Patines de hielo artísticos; Patines de hockey sobre hielo; Patines de hielo recreativos; Deslizadores de nieve; Patines de hielo de velocidad
en: Sporting Goods > Athletics > Figure Skating & Hockey > Ice Skates: Double Blade Ice Skates; Figure Ice Skates; Hockey Ice Skates; Recreational Ice Skates; Snow Gliders; Speed Ice Skates
pl: Sprzęt sportowy > Sport > Łyżwiarstwo figurowe i hokej > Łyżwy: Łyżwy z podwójnym ostrzem; Łyżwy figurowe; Łyżwy hokejowe; Łyżwy rekreacyjne; Ślizgi śnieżne; Panczeny
sl-SI: Športna oprema > Šport > Umetnostno drsanje in hokej > Drsalke: Drsalke z dvojnim rezilom; Drsalke za umetnostno drsanje; Hokejske drsalke; Drsalke za prosti čas; Lopate za sankanje; Drsalke za hitrostno drsanje
hu: Sportszerek > Atlétika > Műkorcsolya és jégkorong > Jégkorcsolyák: Dupla pengés jégkorcsolyák; Műkorcsolyák; Jégkorongkorcsolyák; Szabadidős jégkorcsolyák; Hósiklók; Gyorskorcsolyák
ja: スポーツ用品 > スポーツ競技 > フィギュアスケート・アイスホッケー用品 > アイススケート靴: ダブルブレードアイススケート靴; フィギュアアイススケート靴; アイスホッケーアイススケート靴; レクリエーション用アイススケート靴; スノーグリッパー; スピードアイススケート靴
sk-SK: Športový tovar > Atletika > Krasokorčuľovanie a hokej > Korčule: Korčule s dvojitou čepeľou; Korčule na krasokorčuľovanie; Hokejové korčule; Rekreačné korčule; Snežné klzáky; Korčule na rýchlokorčuľovanie
bg-BG: Спортни стоки > Спортни занимания > Фигурно пързаляне и хокей > Кънки за лед: Кънки за лед с двойно острие; Кънки за лед за фигурно пързаляне; Кънки за лед за хокей; Кънки за лед за развлечение; Миниски; Скоростни кънки за лед
ko: 스포츠용품 > 운동 > 피겨 스케이팅/하키 > 스케이트화: 더블 블레이드 스케이트화; 피겨 스케이트화; 하키 스케이트화; 취미용 스케이트화; 스노 글라이더; 스피드 스케이트화
nl: Sportartikelen > Lichaamssporten > Kunstrijden en ijshockey > Schaatsen: Schaatsen met dubbel blad; Kunstschaatsen; Hockeyschaatsen; Recreatieve schaatsen; Sneeuwglijders; Snelheidsschaatsen
cs: Sportovní potřeby > Atletické sporty > Krasobruslení a hokej > Brusle: Brusle se dvěma noži; Krasobruslařské brusle; Hokejové brusle; Rekreační brusle; Mini lyže; Rychlobruslařské brusle
lt-LT: Sporto prekės > Atletika > Dailusis čiuožimas ir ledo ritulys > Pačiūžos: Pačiūžos dvigubais ašmenimi; Dailiojo čiuožimo pačiūžos; Ledo ritulio pačiūžos; Pramoginės pačiūžos; Čiuožynės; Greitojo čiuožimo pačiūžos
ru: Спортивные товары > Соревновательный спорт > Хоккей и фигурное катание > Коньки: Коньки с двумя лезвиями; Фигурные коньки; Хоккейные коньки; Любительские коньки; Мини-лыжи; Беговые коньки
fr: Équipements sportifs > Divers sports > Patinage artistique et hockey > Patins à glace: Patins à glace à double lame; Patins à glace artistiques; Patins à glace de hockey; Patins à glace récréatifs; Luges; Patins à glace de vitesse
hr-HR: Sportska oprema > Atletika > Umjetničko klizanje i hokej > Klizaljke: Klizaljke s dvostrukom oštricom; Klizaljke za umjetničko klizanje; Klizaljke za hokej; Klizaljke za rekreativno klizanje; Tanjuri za sanjkanje po snijegu; Klizaljke za brzo klizanje
de: Sportartikel > Athletik > Eiskunstlauf & Hockey > Schlittschuhe: Doppelkufen-Schlittschuhe; Eiskunstlauf-Schlittschuhe; Hockey-Schlittschuhe; Freizeit-Schlittschuhe; Schneegleiter; Schnelllauf-Schlittschuhe
zh-CN: 体育用品 > 田径 > 花样滑冰与冰球 > 溜冰鞋: 双刃溜冰鞋; 花样滑冰鞋; 冰球溜冰鞋; 休闲溜冰鞋; 雪地滑行器; 速滑溜冰鞋
fi: Urheilutarvikkeet > Urheilu > Taitoluistelu ja jääkiekko > Luistimet: Tuplateräluistimet; Taitoluistimet; Jääkiekkoluistimet; Vapaa-ajan luistimet; Liukurit; Nopeusluistimet
pt-PT: Artigos de desporto > Atividade desportiva > Hóquei e patinagem artística > Patins de gelo: Patins de gelo de lâmina dupla; Patins de gelo para patinagem artística; Patins de gelo para hóquei; Patins de gelo recreativos; Trenós para neve; Patins de gelo para velocidade
th: อุปกรณ์กีฬา > การกีฬา > สเกตลีลาและฮอกกี้ > สเกตน้ำแข็ง: สเก็ตน้ำแข็งใบมีดคู่; สเก็ตน้ำแข็งลีลา; สเก็ตน้ำแข็งฮอกกี้; สเก็ตน้ำแข็งเพื่อความบันเทิง; เครื่องร่อนหิมะ; สเก็ตน้ำแข็งแบบเร็ว
nb: Sportsutstyr > Friidrett > Kunstløp og hockey > Skøyter: Skøyter med dobbelt blad; Kunstskøyter; Ishockeyskøyter; Fritidsskøyter; Snøglidere; Hastighetsskøyter
ro-RO: Articole sportive > Atletism > Patinaj artistic și hochei > Patine pentru patinaj pe gheață: Patine cu lamă dublă; Patine pentru patinaj artistic; Patine pentru hochei; Patine pentru patinaj de agrement; Sănii pentru zăpadă; Patine pentru patinaj viteză
pt-BR: Artigos esportivos > Artigos para prática de esportes > Patinação artística e hóquei > Patins para gelo: Patins de gelo de lâmina dupla; Patins de gelo para patinação artística; Patins de gelo para hóquei; Patins de gelo recreativos; Trenós para neve; Patins de gelo para velocidade